Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2761
Income tax; return; required by whom.

An income tax return with respect to the income tax imposed by the provisions of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall be made by the following:

(1) Every resident individual who is required to file a federal income tax return for the taxable year;

(2) Every nonresident individual who has income from Nebraska sources;

(3) Every resident estate or trust which is required to file a federal income tax return except a simple trust not required to file under subsection (2) of section 77-2717;

(4) Every nonresident estate or trust which has taxable income from Nebraska sources;

(5) Every corporation or any other entity taxed as a corporation under the Internal Revenue Code which is required to file a federal income tax return except the small business corporations not required to file under subsection (7) of section 77-2734.01;

(6) Every limited liability company having income derived from Nebraska sources; and

(7) Every partnership having income derived from Nebraska sources.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 61, p. 1598;

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 25;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 510;

Laws 2009, LB165, § 13;

Laws 2019, LB512, § 22.